District of Columbia statutes.
34-1264.03

Rights reserved to District.

The District expressly reserves the following rights:

(1)

To exercise its governmental powers, now or hereafter, to the full extent that the powers may be vested in or granted to the District.

(2)

To adopt, in addition to the provisions contained herein and in the franchise and in any existing applicable acts, additional regulations that it finds necessary in the exercise of its police power, if the regulations, by act or otherwise, shall be reasonable and not in conflict with the rights herein granted or the provisions contained in a franchise agreement.

Aug. 21, 1982, D.C. Law 4-142, § 1403
as added Oct. 9, 2002, D.C. Law 14-193, § 2(b), 49 DCR 7334